District of Columbia statutes.
21-106

Guardian of estate.

(a)

Subject to sections 21-101 to 21-104, when land descends or is devised to an infant under 18 years of age, or the infant is entitled to a distributive share of the personal estate of an intestate or to a legacy or bequest under a last will, or acquires real or personal property by gift or purchase, the Probate Court may appoint a guardian of the infant’s estate; and if there is a guardian of the person of the infant the guardian of the estate so appointed may be the same or a different person.

(b)

The appointment may be made at any time after the probate of the will or the grant of administration when the infant is entitled as a devisee, legatee, or next of kin.

(c)

Only trust companies may act as guardian of the estate of more than five infants at one time, unless the infants are entitled to shares of the same estate.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 4(e), 23 DCR 1181
1981 Ed., § 21-106.
1973 Ed., § 21-106.